src/scripts/Polish/tok.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2021 - 2023 Grzegorz Zlotowicz  <grzezlo@gmail.com>
# Copyright (C) 2021 - 2023 Zvonimir Stanecic  <zvonimirek222@yandex.com>

define CaseVariants 
a -> a|A , 
ą -> ą|Ą , 
b -> b|B , 
c -> c|C , 
ć -> ć|Ć , 
d -> d|D , 
e -> e|E , 
ę -> ę|Ę , 
f -> f|F , 
g -> g|G , 
h -> h|H , 
i -> i|I , 
j -> j|J , 
k -> k|K , 
l -> l|L , 
ł -> ł|Ł , 
m -> m|M , 
n -> n|N , 
ń -> ń|Ń , 
o -> o|O , 
ó -> ó|Ó , 
p -> p|P , 
q -> q|Q , 
r -> r|R , 
s -> s|S , 
ś -> ś|Ś , 
t -> t|T , 
u -> u|U , 
v -> v|V , 
w -> w|W , 
x -> x|X , 
y -> y|Y , 
z -> z|Z , 
ź -> ź|Ź , 
ż -> ż|Ż ; 

define ConsonantLetterSequence 
[b|c|ć|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|ł|m|n|ń|q|p|r|s|ś|t|v|w|x|z|ź|ż]+ - [w|z]; 

define LetterSequence 
[ConsonantLetterSequence .o. CaseVariants].l ; 

define Letter a|A|ą|Ą|b|B|c|C|ć|Ć|d|D|e|E|ę|Ę|f|F|g|G|h|H|i|I|j|J|k|K|l|L|ł|Ł|m|M|n|N|ń|Ń|o|O|ó|Ó|p|P|q|Q|r|R|s|S|ś|Ś|t|T|u|U|v|V|w|W|x|X|y|Y|z|Z|ź|Ź|ż|Ż;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;
define Digit %0|NZDigit;

define UnformattedNumber [Digit Digit*] ;
define Number  UnformattedNumber;
define DecimalSeparator %.|%,;

define Word Letter+ ;

define Stage1 
Number @-> ... num || _ ,, 
Word @-> ... word || _ .#. | \Letter ,, 
\[Letter | Digit] @-> ... sym || _ ; 

define Stage2 
word -> lseq || [.#.|word|num|sym] LetterSequence _ ,, 
sym -> num || [sym|.#.] %- _ Digit,
sym -> num || [sym|.#.] %+ _ Digit,
num DecimalSeparator _ Digit+,,
num -> dig || Digit^16 _ ;

define Stage3 
word -> lseq || .#.  [y|Y|ó|Ó] _ ,,
num -> sym || DecimalSeparator _ Digit+ num DecimalSeparator num,
 DecimalSeparator num Digit+ num DecimalSeparator _ ;

source unicodechars.foma

regex UnicodeToNativeTranslitTok .o.
Stage1 .o.
Stage2 .o. 
Stage3;
